Washington statutes.
RCW 44.68.060

Legislative service center—Duties—Protection of information—Bill drafts.

(1) The administrative committee shall establish a legislative service center. The center shall provide automatic data processing services, equipment, training, and support to the legislature and legislative agencies. The center may also, by agreement, provide services to agencies of the judicial and executive branches of state government and other governmental entities, and provide public access to legislative information. All operations of the center shall be subject to the general supervision of the administrative committee in accordance with the policies, procedures, and standards established under RCW 44.68.050.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (3) of this section, determinations regarding the security, disclosure, and disposition of information placed or maintained in the center shall rest solely with the originator and shall be made in accordance with any law regulating the disclosure of such information. The originator is the person who directly places information in the center.

(3) When utilizing the center to carry out the bill drafting functions required under RCW 1.08.027, the code reviser shall be considered the originator as defined in this section. However, determinations regarding the security, disclosure, and disposition of drafts placed or maintained in the center shall be made by the person requesting the code reviser's services and the code reviser, acting as the originator, shall comply with and carry out such determinations as directed by that person. A measure once introduced shall not be considered a draft under this subsection.

[ 2020 c 114 s 12; 2007 c 18 s 5; 1986 c 61 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.